North Carolina statutes. Chapter 37. Allocation of Principal and Income. [Repealed]
Article 2. Principal and Income Act of 1973. [Repealed]

§§ 37-16 through 37-40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-232, s. 1, effective January 1, 2004, and applicable to every trust or decedent’s estate existing on that date or coming into existence after that date, except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in provisions of Chapter 37A of the General Statutes.

Cross References.

As to present similar provisions, see the Uniform Principal and Income Act, see

G.S. 37A-1-101

et seq.